New York, session 2025-2026, S6461.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 399-z of the general business law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 9-a to read as follows: 3 9-a. Where a customer requests to have such customer's telephone 4 number put on a do-not-call list maintained by a telemarketer and such 5 telemarketer maintains more than one such do-not-call list, the tele- 6 marketer shall place the telephone number of such customer on all 7 do-not-call lists maintained by such telemarketer. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03450-01-5